Nevada, session 83, AB325.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 414 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. “Artificial intelligence” means a machine-based
system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make
predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or
virtual environments.
Sec. 3. Any state emergency management plan prepared
pursuant to NRS 414.060 and each plan for emergency operations
described in subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 4 of
NRS 414.040 that is adopted by a state or local governmental
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
agency must include provisions ensuring that final decisions
regarding emergency response planning and the allocation of
resources in response to an emergency are not made by artificial
intelligence but rather by a natural person.
Sec. 4. NRS 414.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.030 As used in this chapter, the words and terms defined
in NRS 414.031 to 414.038, inclusive, and section 2 of this act have
the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 5. Chapter 704 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A public utility shall not make a final decision regarding
whether to reduce or shut down utility service in response to a
disaster or emergency based solely on the use of artificial
intelligence.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Artificial intelligence” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 2 of this act.
(b) “Disaster” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 414.0335.
(c) “Emergency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 414.0345.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)